Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4177.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 73104. A person shall not remove, deface, or destroy a sign or poster that has been posted, pursuant to or a purple paint mark that has been placed on a tree or post, under this part. Sec. 73105. A person shall not post a sign, or place a purple paint mark on a tree or post, on property owned by another person or enclose the property of another person to prohibit hunting, fishing, trapping, or other recreational activities on that property without the written permission of the owner of that property or his or her the owner's lessee or agent. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4176 (request no. H01799'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.